Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-503
Decree.

Upon the hearing of the complaint, if the court is satisfied that it is made in good faith by the plaintiff, that he or she or some other person selected by the court is a proper person to exercise the power and make the mortgage, and that it is necessary and proper, the court shall enter a decree authorizing the execution of a mortgage for and in the name of such mentally incompetent husband or wife by the plaintiff or such other person as the court may appoint.

Laws 1927, c. 66, § 3, p. 229;

C.S.1929, § 42-503;

R.S.1943, § 42-503;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 17;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 35.